Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
STATEWIDE DEFINED BENEFIT PLAN

31-31-401. Applicability of plan.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2023.] Every employer in this state shall provide the pension benefits of the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4 for members hired on or after April 8, 1978, except for the following:

Any employer that began covering members under the federal "Social Security Act" on or before August 11, 2005, and any employer that began covering members under the federal "Social Security Act" on or before August 11, 2005, that chooses to cover members hired after August 11, 2005, under the federal "Social Security Act";

Any employer that covers members under an exempt plan established pursuant to part 8 of article 30.5 of this title;

Any employer that has withdrawn its members from the statewide defined benefit plan pursuant to part 6 of this article and established a locally administered and financed alternative pension plan;

Any employer that has withdrawn its members from the statewide defined benefit plan for the purpose of covering them under the statewide money purchase plan established pursuant to part 5 of this article; and

Any employer that covers a member hired on or after April 8, 1978, but before January 1, 1980, under an old hire pension plan as permitted by section 31-30.5-103 (1).

Nothing in this part 4 shall affect retirement pensions or disability or survivor benefits of members hired prior to April 8, 1978, who retired, were disabled, or died prior to January 1, 1980.

Where an employer results from a merger, a consolidation, or an exclusion or dissolution proceeding between or among one or more employers, including a new governmental entity created by intergovernmental agreement between or among one or more employers, all members transferred to or employed by such resulting employer shall, for the purposes of this article 31 and article 30.5 of this title 31, have those rights and obligations they had prior to the merger, consolidation, exclusion, dissolution, or intergovernmental agreement. In the event of a transfer of members, provision shall be made in such agreement or proceeding for allocation and transfer of plan assets, and, in the event of the transfer of members of a defined benefit plan, provision shall be made in such agreement or proceeding for discharging plan liabilities and funding in order to maintain or enhance the actuarial soundness of the remaining and resulting plans. If the resulting employer had no members prior to the merger, consolidation, exclusion, or dissolution, it may continue as its plan any plan of a transferring employer, authorized by this article, for its members hired after the effective date of the agreement or proceeding or the resulting employer shall belong to the statewide defined benefit plan. The board may authorize the resulting employer to consolidate preexisting retirement plans and any retirement plan attributable solely to the resulting employer into one or more plans if the plans to be consolidated are identical, the benefits are equal for all members covered under the retirement provisions of the plans, and no member suffers a reduction of benefits or an increase in member contributions due to such plan consolidation. Any member employed by a predecessor department who participated in a money purchase plan prior to the merger, consolidation, exclusion, or dissolution and who participates in the statewide defined benefit plan after the merger, consolidation, exclusion, or dissolution shall pay the continuing uniform rate of contribution established by the board pursuant to section 31-31-1101 (7).

A department chief hired on or after April 8, 1978, shall be exempted from the statewide defined benefit plan, upon the execution of a written agreement between the department chief and the chief's employer that provides for the department chief's participation in social security or in a federal insurance contribution act replacement plan as allowed under the federal internal revenue code, and the submission of notice to the association. A department chief may satisfy the federal insurance contribution act replacement plan requirement by participating in an employer sponsored plan, the statewide money purchase plan, or the statewide hybrid plan. The transfer of member and employer contributions between the statewide defined benefit plan and the statewide money purchase plan shall be consistent with the provisions of section 31-31-501.

For purposes of this subsection (4), a "department chief" means the senior command officer of any fire or police department of any employer, by whatever title known, including but not limited to chief, administrator, or director.

A department chief exempted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) may maintain coverage for disability and survivor benefits under part 8 of this article if the department chief participates in the statewide money purchase plan, the statewide hybrid plan, or a local money purchase plan that is qualified under section 401(a) of the federal internal revenue code and that has a contribution rate of not less than sixteen percent.

A member normally serving less than one thousand six hundred hours in any calendar year shall be exempted from the statewide defined benefit plan and shall be covered under the statewide money purchase plan.

If an employer that is otherwise required to enroll its members under the plan fails to properly enroll such members, neither the fire and police pension association nor the defined benefit system trust fund is obligated or liable for any purpose to any person or employer arising from such failure.

31-31-401. Applicability of plan.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2023.] Every employer in this state shall provide the pension benefits of the statewide retirement plan established by part 31.5 of this title 31 for members hired on or after April 8, 1978, except for the following:

Any employer that began covering members under the federal "Social Security Act" on or before August 11, 2005, and any employer that began covering members under the federal "Social Security Act" on or before August 11, 2005, that chooses to cover members hired after August 11, 2005, under the federal "Social Security Act";

Any employer that covers members under an exempt plan established pursuant to part 8 of article 30.5 of this title;

Any employer that has withdrawn its members from the statewide defined benefit plan pursuant to part 6 of this article and established a locally administered and financed alternative pension plan;

Any employer that has withdrawn its members from the statewide defined benefit plan for the purpose of covering them under the statewide money purchase plan established pursuant to part 5 of this article; and

Any employer that covers a member hired on or after April 8, 1978, but before January 1, 1980, under an old hire pension plan as permitted by section 31-30.5-103 (1).

Nothing in this part 4 shall affect retirement pensions or disability or survivor benefits of members hired prior to April 8, 1978, who retired, were disabled, or died prior to January 1, 1980.

Where an employer results from a merger, a consolidation, or an exclusion or dissolution proceeding between or among one or more employers, including a new governmental entity created by intergovernmental agreement between or among one or more employers, all members transferred to or employed by such resulting employer shall, for the purposes of this article 31 and articles 30.5 and 31.5 of this title 31, have those rights and obligations they had prior to the merger, consolidation, exclusion, dissolution, or intergovernmental agreement. In the event of a transfer of members, provision shall be made in such agreement or proceeding for allocation and transfer of plan assets, and, in the event of the transfer of members of a defined benefit plan, provision shall be made in such agreement or proceeding for discharging plan liabilities and funding in order to maintain or enhance the actuarial soundness of the remaining and resulting plans. If the resulting employer had no members prior to the merger, consolidation, exclusion, or dissolution, it may continue as its plan any plan of a transferring employer, authorized by this article, for its members hired after the effective date of the agreement or proceeding or the resulting employer shall belong to the statewide retirement plan. The board may authorize the resulting employer to consolidate preexisting retirement plans and any retirement plan attributable solely to the resulting employer into one or more plans if the plans to be consolidated are identical, the benefits are equal for all members covered under the retirement provisions of the plans, and no member suffers a reduction of benefits or an increase in member contributions due to such plan consolidation. Any member employed by a predecessor department who participated in a money purchase plan prior to the merger, consolidation, exclusion, or dissolution and who participates in the statewide retirement plan after the merger, consolidation, exclusion, or dissolution shall pay the continuing uniform rate of contribution established by the board pursuant to section 31-31.5-305.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

A member normally serving less than one thousand six hundred hours in any calendar year shall be exempted from the lifetime benefit components of the statewide retirement plan and shall be covered under the statewide money purchase plan.

If an employer that is otherwise required to enroll its members under a plan fails to properly enroll such members, neither the fire and police pension association nor the defined benefit system trust fund is obligated or liable for any purpose to any person or employer arising from such failure.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 902, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(5) added, p. 1232, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) amended, p. 305, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(6) added, (SB 13-080), ch. 68, p. 222, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2015:

(3) amended, (SB 15-026), ch. 8, p. 18, § 1, effective August 5; (4)(a) amended and (4)(c) added, (SB 15-028), ch. 10, p. 23, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (HB 18-1031), ch. 5, p. 35, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 302, § 6, effective January 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1003 (1), (2)(a)(I), (4), (5), and (7).

Cross references:

For the "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. sec. 301 et seq.

31-31-402. Employer and member contributions - repeal.

Every member covered under the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4 shall pay into the defined benefit system trust fund eight percent of salary paid or such higher member contribution rate established pursuant to section 31-31-408 (1.5)(a) or (1.6)(a). The member contribution rate shall increase by four percent to be implemented through eight annual increases as follows: Beginning in 2015, and each year thereafter through 2022, the member contribution rate shall increase by an additional one-half of one percent of base salary until the total member contribution rate, including the cumulative contribution rate increases, is twelve percent of base salary. The payment shall be made by the employer by deduction from the salary paid such member. Each employer shall pick up the member contributions required for all salaries paid after July 1, 1985, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions pursuant to section 414 (h)(2) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, in determining tax treatment under such code. The employer shall pay these member contributions directly to the retirement association, instead of paying such amounts to members, and such contributions shall be paid from the same funds that are used in paying salaries to the members. Such contributions, although designated as member contributions, shall be paid by the employer in lieu of contributions by members. Members may not elect to choose to receive such contributions directly instead of having them paid by the employer to the pension plan. Member contributions so picked up shall be treated for all purposes of this article 31, other than federal tax, in the same manner as member contributions made before the date picked up. Payment shall be made by one voucher for the aggregate amount deducted and shall be made no later than ten days following the date of payment of salary to the member. All such payments shall be credited to the defined benefit system trust fund.

Every employer employing members who are covered by the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4 shall pay into the defined benefit system trust fund eight percent of the salary paid to such member or such higher employer contribution rate established pursuant to section 31-31-408 (1.6)(a), and such payment shall be made no later than ten days following the date of payment of salary to the member. The employer contribution rate shall increase by four percent to be implemented through eight annual increases as follows: Beginning in 2021, and each year thereafter through 2028, the employer contribution rate shall increase by an additional one-half of one percent of base salary until the total employer contribution rate, including the cumulative contribution rate increases, is twelve percent of base salary. All such payments shall be credited to the defined benefit system trust fund.

In addition to the rate established in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the employer contribution rate shall be increased by one percent of base salary to be implemented as follows: Beginning in 2021, and continuing through 2022, or beginning in a subsequent year in the event another employer contribution rate increase is under implementation, the employer contribution rate shall increase by an additional one-half of one percent of base salary in each year for a total of a one percent increase in order to pay for the cost of the benefit established in section 31-31-403 (4)(b).

The general assembly declares that the rates of member and employer contributions shall be adequate to fund benefit liabilities accrued under the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4, and to this end, the board shall submit an annual actuarial valuation report to the state auditor, the legislative audit committee, and the joint budget committee of the general assembly, together with any recommendations concerning such liabilities as accrued. Amortization of such liability over a forty-year period shall be deemed adequate to maintain actuarial stability. If the actual financial experience of the new hire benefits account in the defined benefit system trust fund is found to be more or less favorable than the assumed experience during the two-year period from January 1, 1980, and each biennium thereafter, adjustments may be made by the board in the member and employer contributions as may be deemed feasible and advisable so long as the employer contribution rate adjustment is equal to the member contribution rate adjustment. If the member contribution rate has been increased pursuant to section 31-31-408 (1.5)(a), the requirement that the employer contribution rate be at least equal to the member contribution rate shall not apply, but in such circumstance, any increase to the employer contribution rate shall be at least equal to the increase in the member contribution rate and any decrease in the member contribution rate shall be at least equal to the decrease in the employer contribution rate.

The payments required by this section are subject to interest if not submitted when due. Payments are due no later than ten days following the date of payment of salary to the member.

There shall be established in the defined benefit system trust fund a new hire benefits account into which contributions made pursuant to this section shall be deposited. The benefits provided by the statewide defined benefit plan established in part 4 of this article, together with the expenses of administering the plan, shall be paid from such account.

Defined benefit assets of the statewide defined benefit plan shall be administered within the fire and police members' benefit investment fund and assets of the of the plan designated for self direction shall be administered within the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund.

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 903, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1865, § 89, effective August 2; (4) amended, p. 45, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2006:

(1), (2), and (3) amended and (5) added, p. 189, § 14, effective March 31.

L. 2007:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 273, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 10-022), ch. 18, p. 82, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2015:

(4) amended, (SB 15-027), ch. 9, p. 20, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2020:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 405, § 2, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(6) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1013.

Cross references:

For the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", see title 26 of the United States Code.

31-31-403. Normal retirement - statewide defined benefit plan - repeal.

Any member covered by the statewide defined benefit plan who has completed at least twenty-five years of active service and has attained the age of fifty-five years shall be eligible for a normal retirement pension subject to adjustment pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section. The annual normal retirement pension shall be two percent of the average of the member's highest three years' base salary multiplied by the member's years of service.

The board shall determine after each annual actuarial valuation if the cost of all benefits established by this part 4 for members covered under this section and the cost of a normal retirement pension beginning at age fifty-five for members then eligible may be fully funded on an actuarially sound basis without necessitating an increase in the employer and member contributions made pursuant to section 31-31-402 or such higher member contribution rate established pursuant to section 31-31-408 (1.5)(a). If the board cannot so determine, it shall order that the normal retirement pension commence such number of months as are actuarially supportable, from one to sixty, after age fifty-five for members who have completed at least twenty-five years of active service and are otherwise eligible in accordance with the board's determination. The determination of the board shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud. A pension commenced after age fifty-five pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) shall not be subject to annual review. If a court determines that this subsection (1)(b) is invalid, the age of retirement to be eligible for any normal retirement benefit shall be age sixty except for persons receiving a benefit at the time of the court's decision.

If in any year the board determines pursuant to this part 4 that the cost of the benefits described in subsection (1)(b) of this section may not be fully funded on an actuarially sound basis without necessitating an increase in the employer and member contribution made pursuant to section 31-31-402 or such higher member contribution rate established pursuant to section 31-31-408 (1.5)(a), the board shall not increase such employer or member contributions unless:

The board has terminated granting additional benefits described in section 31-31-405.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2020.)

Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to prohibit the board from utilizing the provisions of section 31-31-405 to provide the benefit described in said section in any subsequent year when the total amount of additional deposits to the new hire benefits account exceeds the amount needed to meet the benefit liabilities funded by the actuarial account pursuant to section 31-31-405.

Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to require the reduction of benefits below the level sustainable by the higher member contribution rate established pursuant to section 31-31-408 (1.5)(a).

Any member retiring and eligible for a normal retirement pension as provided by subsection (1) of this section may elect to defer receipt of such pension until attaining the age of sixty-five years. In the case of such election, the annual deferred retirement pension shall be the actuarial equivalent of the normal retirement pension.

Any member covered by the statewide defined benefit plan who has completed at least thirty years of active service or has attained the age of fifty years and who is not receiving benefits pursuant to section 31-31-803 may elect to retire from active service and shall be eligible for an early retirement pension. The annual early retirement pension for a member shall be the benefit, as determined by the board, that the member would have received at normal retirement reduced on an actuarial equivalent basis to reflect the early receipt of the benefit.

Beginning January 1, 2021, any member covered by the statewide defined benefit plan who has attained the age of fifty years, whose combined age and years of accrued service is equal to at least eighty, and who is not receiving the benefits pursuant to section 31-31-803 shall be eligible for an unreduced normal retirement pension.

If the board adjusts the age of eligibility pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, it shall also adjust the age of eligibility for benefits under subsections (4)(a) and (4)(b) of this section in a like manner.

A member eligible for a normal, deferred, or early retirement pension may elect to receive one of the following pension options in lieu of a pension computed in accordance with subsection (1), (3), or (4) of this section:

Option 1. A reduced pension payable to the member and upon the member's death, all of such reduced pension to be paid to the member's designated beneficiary for life;

Option 2. A reduced pension payable to the member and upon the member's death, one-half of such reduced pension to be paid to the member's designated beneficiary for life;

Option 3. A reduced pension payable jointly to the member and the member's designated beneficiary and, upon the death of either, one-half of such reduced pension to be paid to the survivor for life.

A member shall be considered to have elected option 1 and retired on the day before the member's death if the member is eligible for a normal or early retirement pension and dies:

Before making an election as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5);

Before the first pension payment has been deposited or otherwise negotiated or sixty days from the date of issuance of such check, whichever occurs first; and

Is survived by a spouse, a dependent child, or a designated beneficiary.

After an election has been made of any of the options provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) and the first pension payment has been deposited or otherwise negotiated by the member, or sixty days from date of issuance of the check have elapsed, whichever occurs first, the election shall be irrevocable. The member's beneficiary designation shall also be irrevocable at such time unless the member's marital status changes as the result of dissolution of marriage, marriage, remarriage, or in the event of the death of a beneficiary. In such case, the member may designate a new beneficiary; except that, in cases of dissolution of marriage, this provision shall only apply to any final dissolution of marriage decree of a member entered on or after July 1, 1990.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c), an unmarried member who receives a single life annuity at the time benefits commence and whose marital status subsequently changes as the result of marriage or remarriage may elect one of the options provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) within one hundred eighty days of the date of the marriage or remarriage or January 1, 2008, whichever date is later. If, after such selection of a different payment option, the member subsequently dies within one hundred eighty days following the marriage or remarriage, the only survivor benefit payable to the member's designated beneficiary shall be the difference between the single life option amount payable to the member prior to marriage or remarriage and the amount of the reduced benefit that was actually paid to the deceased member after the marriage or remarriage and prior to the member's death.

The joint pension benefits provided by this subsection (5) shall be calculated as the actuarial equivalent of the normal or early retirement pension otherwise payable as provided in subsections (1), (3), and (4) of this section. In the event of a change in beneficiary designation pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), the joint pension benefits payable shall be recalculated so as to be the actuarial equivalent of the remainder of the original pension benefits based upon the member's initial beneficiary designation, if any. In the event of a change in option elected pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), the joint pension benefits payable shall be recalculated so as to be the actuarial equivalent of the remainder of the original pension benefits payable to the member immediately prior to the change in option.

If the total amount of pension benefits paid as provided in this section is less than the amount of the member's accumulated contributions at the time of death, the difference shall be paid to:

The member's estate if no pension payment was made pursuant to subsection (5) of this section; or

The survivor's estate if pension payments were made pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

All service of a member who is employed by successive employers shall be aggregated for determining eligibility and benefits provided by this section if the service for each employer was rendered while the employer covered its members under the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4. The service of a member who is employed by successive employers shall be aggregated for determining eligibility and benefits provided by the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4 if the service for any employer was rendered while the employer did not cover its members under the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4 only on the basis of agreements made with the board.

The board may promulgate rules to allow members who are eligible to receive any type of retirement benefits to defer receipt of the benefits to the extent permitted under section 401 (a)(9) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", 26 U.S.C. sec. 401 (a)(9), as amended, and the regulations promulgated pursuant to section 401 (a)(9).

(8) This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 905, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2001:

(1), (4), (5)(b)(II), (5)(b)(III), and (5)(c) amended and (8) added, p. 417, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(2)(a)(II) amended, p. 742, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(2)(a)(II) and (2)(b) amended, p. 191, § 15, effective March 31.

L. 2007:

(5)(c) and (5)(d) amended, p. 50, § 1, effective March 14.

L. 2010:

(1)(b) and IP(2)(a) amended and (2)(c) added, (SB 10-022), ch. 18, p. 83, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2020:

(1), (2)(a), and (4) amended, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 406, § 3, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(9) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1006.

31-31-404. Return or transfer of contributions - vested retirement - repeal.

Any member covered by the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4 and terminating service may elect to have the member's accumulated contributions refunded in a lump sum and shall sign a statement to be filed with the member's employer evidencing such election and acknowledging that the member has no right to benefits provided by this article. A member shall only be eligible for a refund, from the association, of the contributions paid by the member to the association and any of the member's contributions that have been transferred to the association by an affiliating employer. Nothing in this subsection (1) shall prevent a member from obtaining a refund to which the member may be entitled from a nonaffiliating employer pursuant to policies established by the employer prior to December 1, 1978. In addition to receiving accumulated contributions, the member shall also receive, as interest, five percent of the member's total accumulated contributions. The contributions refunded pursuant to this subsection (1) shall not include contributions other than those required to be made by the member, and the return of contributions shall be made within one hundred twenty days.

If the member who terminated service subsequently returns to service as an active member with an employer that covers its members under the statewide defined benefit plan, the member's prior service credit shall be restored when the member returns the member's refunded contributions, with interest accrued from the date of refund to the date of return, according to the terms and conditions established by the board. If the member fails to return such contributions and interest, the member shall be treated as a new member, and the member's prior service shall not be recognized in determining pension eligibility or pension benefits.

In lieu of having the member's contributions returned as provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section, a member who has at least five years of credited service may leave the contributions with the fund. When the inactive member attains age fifty-five, the member shall be eligible to receive an annual vested benefit equal to two percent of the member's average highest three years' salary multiplied by years of active service. Any such member shall be eligible to receive the applicable vested benefit as provided in this section or to make an election for a reduced pension in the manner provided in section 31-31-403 (5). All the provisions of section 31-31-403 (5) shall apply to the member; except that the benefits used to calculate the reduced benefits shall be the vested benefit provided to the member under this section rather than the retirement benefit provided in section 31-31-403. The member may not elect one of the options earlier than sixty days prior to the commencement of vested benefit payments. In the event that an inactive member who is eligible for vested benefits dies prior to the commencement of the member's benefit payments, the fire and police pension association shall refund the inactive member's contributions to the member's estate, and no vested benefits shall be payable to the inactive member's survivors or beneficiaries.

The board shall determine after each annual actuarial valuation if the cost of all benefits established by this part 4 for members covered under section 31-31-403 and the cost of vested benefits beginning at age fifty-five for members then eligible may be fully funded on an actuarially sound basis without necessitating an increase in the employer and member contributions made pursuant to section 31-31-402 or such higher member contribution rate established pursuant to section 31-31-408 (1.5)(a). If the board cannot so determine, it shall order that the vested benefits commence such number of months as are actuarially supportable, from one to one hundred twenty, after age fifty-five for eligible members in accordance with the board's determination. The determination of the board shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud. A vested benefit commenced before age fifty-five pursuant to this subsection (2)(b) shall not be subject to annual review. If a court determines that this subsection (2)(b) is invalid, the age to be eligible for a vested benefit shall be age sixty-five except for persons receiving a benefit at the time of the court's decision.

The board may promulgate rules to allow members who are eligible to receive any type of retirement benefits to defer receipt of the benefits to the extent permitted under section 401 (a)(9) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", 26 U.S.C. sec. 401 (a)(9), as amended, and the regulations promulgated pursuant to section 401 (a)(9).

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 907, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 99:

(1)(b) amended, p. 36, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2001:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 418, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) amended, p. 742, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2010:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 10-022), ch. 18, p. 84, § 3, effective August 11.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 408, § 4, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(4) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1011.

31-31-405. Stabilization reserve account and separate retirement account - creation - allocation - repeal.

Within the new hire benefits account, created pursuant to section 31-31-402 (5), there shall be established two subaccounts:

An actuarial account, into which that portion of the new hire benefits account necessary to fund benefit liabilities accrued under sections 31-31-403 and 31-31-404 (2), as determined by the 1987 actuarial study, shall be deposited;

A stabilization reserve account, into which the remainder in the new hire benefits account, after allocation pursuant to subparagraph (a) of this subsection (1), may be deposited.

In each year after 2021, the board may allocate additional deposits to the new hire benefits account between the actuarial account and the stabilization reserve account based upon the actuarial study for the previous year. If in any year the total amount of additional deposits to the new hire benefits account exceeds the amount required to meet any increase in the benefit liabilities funded by the actuarial account, the board, in its sole discretion, may allocate all or any part of such excess to the stabilization reserve account.

The stabilization reserve account created by subsection (1) of this section shall consist of individual separate retirement accounts established in the name of each member covered by the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4. Funds allocated to the separate retirement accounts shall be in the nature of a defined contribution account and subject to self direction by the member. The board shall transfer the balances of the predecessor separate retirement accounts contained within the members benefit investment fund to defined contribution accounts on or about January 1, 2021. Members covered on a supplemental basis pursuant to section 31-31-704.5 shall be eligible for individual separate retirement accounts.

Such amount as may be allocated to the stabilization reserve account pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be further allocated to each member's separate retirement account based upon the difference between a member's employer and employee contributions to the new hire benefits account for each payroll period and the proportionate amount of such contributions that is allocated to the actuarial account pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Earnings or losses on the amount allocated to the member's separate retirement account while invested as part of the member's benefit investment fund shall be allocated at least monthly on a time-weighted basis as determined by the board until the account is exhausted. Earnings or losses on the amount allocated to the member's separate retirement account while invested as part of the members self-directed investment fund shall be allocated as determined by the record keeper.

Any amount allocated to a member's separate retirement account shall be subject to the vesting and distribution requirements under the plan.

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 909, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2000:

(4) amended, p. 76, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 419, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 101, § 1, effective March 27; entire section amended, p. 191, § 16, effective March 31.

L. 2020:

(2), (3), (5), and (6) amended, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 408, § 5, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(7) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.